District of Columbia statutes.
47-3402

Annual payment by the United States — Appropriations — Generally.

There are authorized to be appropriated, as the annual payment by the United States toward defraying the expenses of the government of the District of Columbia, not to exceed $173,000,000 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1972, and not to exceed $178,000,000 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1973, and for each fiscal year thereafter. Sums appropriated under this section shall be credited to the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 361, ch. 258, Art. VI, § 1
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VII, § 701
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 857, Pub. L. 89-610, title V, § 501
Nov. 3, 1967, 81 Stat. 339, Pub. L. 90-120, title I, § 101
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 90-450, title I, § 101
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 180, Pub. L. 91-106, title VII, § 701
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1930, Pub. L. 91-650, title I, § 101
Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 654, Pub. L. 92-196, title VI, § 601(a)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-3403.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3402.
1973 Ed., § 47-2501a.

Editor's Notes

Federal payment to the District of Columbia: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2356, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for payment to the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1997, $660,000,000.